Utah statutes.
53A-1a-1007.    Annual report.

(1)  The State Board of Education shall make a report on UPSTART to the Education Interim Committee by November 30 each year.

(2)  The report shall:

(a)  address the extent to which UPSTART is accomplishing the purposes for which it was established as specified in Section 53A-1a-1002; and

(b)  include the following information:

(i)  the number of families:

(A)  volunteering to participate in the program;

(B)  selected to participate in the program;

(C)  requesting computers; and

(D)  furnished computers;

(ii)  the frequency of use of the instructional software;

(iii)  obstacles encountered with software usage, hardware, or providing technical assistance to families;

(iv)  student performance on pre-kindergarten and post-kindergarten assessments conducted by school districts and charter schools for students who participated in the home-based educational technology program and those who did not participate in the program; and

(v)  as available, the evaluation of the program conducted pursuant to Section 53A-1a-1006.

